District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.18

Repealed

Establishment of Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 218, 41 DCR 5333
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-213, § 2, 51 DCR 8822
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-181, § 2, 55 DCR 6094
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 237, 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78, § 2(d), 56 DCR 6959
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(q), 57 DCR 181
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7212(c), 60 DCR 12472
July 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-15, § 2(b), 62 DCR 6872
1981 Ed., § 9-819.
D.C. Law 15-213 rewrote the section .
D.C. Law 17-181 rewrote subsec. (b); in subsec. (e), substituted “Council’s committee with oversight over the Washington Convention Center Authority” for “Committee on Economic Development”; added subsec. (h-1); and, in subsec. (i), substituted “dissolve one year after a Certificate of Occupancy is issued for the Headquarters Hotel;” for “dissolve on December 31, 2010;”.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (b)(4).
D.C. Law 18-78, in subsec. (h-1), substituted “new convention center hotel” for “Walter E. Washington Convention Center Headquarters Hotel (’Headquarters Hotel’)” and “ new convention center hotel” for “Headquarters Hotel”; and, in subsec. (i), substituted “new convention center hotel” for “Headquarters Hotel”.
D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “City Administrator or the City Administrator’s” for “Deputy Mayor for Operations (or successor officer) or the Deputy Mayor’s”; and, in subsecs. (b)(4) and (7), substituted “Authority” for “Washington Convention Center Authority”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “ANC 6E” for “ANC2C” in (b)(10).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Continuity Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-21, June 21, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5465).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Continuity Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-122, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3809).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Continuity Third Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-209, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 453).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Continuity Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-3, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5426).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Continuity Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-74, April 4, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 3333).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-254, March 8, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 3039).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-74, January 23, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 1454).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Continuity Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-46, March 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2815).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Continuity Second Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-288, January 6, 2004, 51 DCR 873).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Continuity Third Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-479, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7617).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Continuity Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-29, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2991).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Continuity Second Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-242, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 264).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Advisory Committee Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-329, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2587).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-569, December 19, 2006, 54 DCR 5).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Advisory Committee Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-150, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10896).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(q) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(q) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7212(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7212(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2(b) of the Events DC Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-60, May 8, 2015, 62 DCR 8022, 21 DCSTAT 1438).
Section 7211 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle U of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Destination DC Technical Clarification Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.